Hawaii statutes.
§483-2 Co-obligor not discharged when.
A judgment against one or more of several obligors, or against one or more of
joint, or of joint and several obligors shall not discharge a co-obligor who
was not a party to the proceeding wherein the judgment was rendered. [L 1941, c
60, §2; RL 1945, §8742; RL 1955, §192-2; HRS §483-2]

Case Notes

Based on the facts and issues raised in plaintiff’s
complaint, the nature of the grievance and the relief sought, where the
essential character of the underlying action was one of equitable contribution
under this section and was not an action in the nature of assumpsit under
§607-14, the circuit court abused its discretion in awarding attorney’s fees
and costs to defendants under §607-14. 128 H. 366 (App.), 289 P.3d 1002
(2012).

Cited: 42 H. 111, 115.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next